District of Columbia statutes.
38-503

Immunization standards; list of immunizations.

The Mayor shall, by regulations, specify the immunization standards to be used for compliance with this chapter, and may also, by regulation, revise the list of requested immunizations.

History

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-20, § 4, 26 DCR 380

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-503.
1973 Ed., § 31-2203.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 3-20, the Immunization of School Students Act of 1979, see Mayor’s Order 2006-117, September 5, 2006 ( 53 DCR 7553).